Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 1 General Provisions
VTD: Memphis 95-2

VTD: Memphis 95-3

VTD: Memphis 96-01

VTD: Morning Sun 02

Blocks (021010): 1015 1016 1017 1018 1052 1123

District 98:

Shelby County

VTD: Bartlett 06

Blocks (020621): 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 4022 4023 4024 4025 4026 4027 4028

Blocks (020651): 1006 1007 1012 1013 1014 1015 1025 1026 1027

VTD: Bartlett 10

Blocks (020532): 3006 3012 3019 3028

VTD: Memphis 36-1

Blocks (001600): 2010 2013

Blocks (001700): 1029 1030 1031 1032 1036 1037 1038 1039 1044

VTD: Memphis 36-2

Blocks (001600): 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2008 2009

Blocks (001700): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1020 1021

VTD: Memphis 36-3

Blocks (001600): 2007 2011

Blocks (001700): 1016 1017 1018 1019 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1033 1034 1035

VTD: Memphis 41-1

Blocks (000600): 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020

VTD: Memphis 41-3

Blocks (000600): 2014 2021 2022 2023

Blocks (000700): 1003 1004 1005 1006 2002 2003 2013 2018 3016 3017 3018 3019

VTD: Memphis 42-1

VTD: Memphis 43-2

Blocks (008900): 3024 3025

Blocks (011100): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1019 1020 1021 1022 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1040 1053 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020

VTD: Memphis 53-1

Blocks (001100): 1001 1005 1006 1007 1013 1014 1015 1017 1018 2000

Blocks (008800): 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4013

Blocks (011100): 1023 1030 1033 1036 1049 1052

VTD: Memphis 53-2

VTD: Memphis 53-3

VTD: Memphis 54

Blocks (008700): 3001 3002

VTD: Memphis 62-0

VTD: Memphis 72-7

Blocks (000600): 1000 1001

Blocks (010220): 4024 4025 6029 6031 6032

Blocks (020511): 2000 2007 2008 2009 2010 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033

VTD: Memphis 83

VTD: Memphis 84-1

VTD: Memphis 84-2

Blocks (020511): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016

Blocks (020512): 3005 3006 3007

VTD: Memphis 86

VTD: Memphis 87-1

VTD: Memphis 87-3

Blocks (020651): 1004 1005 1024 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004 4005 4006 4007 4008 4009 4010 4011 4012 4013 4014 4015 4016 4017 4018 4019 4020 4021 5000 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5008 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5015 5016 5017 5018 5019 5020

VTD: Memphis 88-3

Blocks (009100): 1000 1013 1014

Blocks (020610): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1034 1038 1046 1047 1048 1049 2001 2002 2003 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2016 2017 2020 2021

Blocks (020621): 2031 2033 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 5001 5002 5003 5004 5005 5006 5007 5009 5010 5011 5012 5013 5014 5015

VTD: Memphis 88-4

VTD: Memphis 88-5

VTD: Memphis 90-2

Blocks (020521): 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 3000 3006 3007 3008 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015

Blocks (020523): 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020

Blocks (020524): 2000 2001 2002 2003 2013 2014 2016 2017 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3009 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017

Blocks (020531): 1007 1008 1014 1015

VTD: Memphis 90-3

District 99:

Shelby County

VTD: ARL-01

VTD: ARL-02

VTD: Bartlett 04

VTD: Bartlett 05

VTD: Bartlett 11

VTD: Brunswick 1

VTD: Brunswick 2

VTD: Kerrville

VTD: Lakeland 1

VTD: Lakeland 2

VTD: Millington 1

Blocks (020300): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1010 1012

VTD: Millington 2

Blocks (020210): 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 2007 2008 2011 2015 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053 2054 2055 2056 2057 2058 2059 2060 2061 2062 2063 2065 2066 2067 2068 3018 3020 3023 3024 3025 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3041

Blocks (020221): 2000 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2037 2038

Blocks (020222): 1014 1017 1026

Blocks (020300): 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1011 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 2000 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2026 2027 2028 2032 2033 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3009 3010 3011 3012 3013 3014 3015 3016 3017 3018 3019 3020 3021 3022 3023 3024 3025 3026 3027 3028 3029 3030 3031 3032 3033 3034 3035 3036 3037 3038 3039 3040 3041 3042 3043 3044 3045 3046 3047 3048 3049 3051

Blocks (020400): 1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011 1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1019 1020 1021 1022 1023 1024 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031 1032 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037 1038 1039 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1046 1047 1048 1049 1050 1051 1052 1053 1054 1055 1056 1057 1058 1059 1060 1061 1062 1063 1064 1065 1066 1067 1068 1069 1070 1071 1072 1073 1074 1075 1076 1077 1078 1079 1080 1081 1082 1083 1084 1085 1086 1087 1088 1089 1090 1091 1092 1093 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2033 2034 2035 2036 2037 2038

VTD: Stewartville

Nothing in this section shall be construed as depriving any member of the house of representatives of the One Hundred Seventh General Assembly of such member's office, or as affecting or modifying the constitutional requirements of article II, § 3 of the Constitution of Tennessee. At the November 2012 general election, and thereafter until changed by law, representatives shall be elected to represent the districts as constituted and provided by this section. If a seat of a member of the house of representatives becomes vacant prior to the general election in November 2012, in accordance with article II, § 15(b) of the Constitution of Tennessee, a successor shall be elected by the county legislative body to represent the district as constituted and provided prior to January 26, 2012.

Any reapportionment of county legislative bodies shall not affect these legislative districts.

Acts 1965 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 3; 1973, ch. 161, §§ 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6; 1974, ch. 600, §§ 1-15; 1974, ch. 657, § 1; 1975, ch. 174, § 1; 1975, ch. 180, § 1; 1976, ch. 622, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 625, §§ 1-7; 1976, ch. 632, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 640, § 1; 1976, ch. 662, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 835, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 304, §§ 1-4; 1978, ch. 579, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 765, §§ 1-4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; 1979, ch. 294, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 441, § 1; T.C.A., § 3-103; Acts 1981, ch. 537, § 1; 1982, ch. 900, §§ 1-49; 1982, ch. 933, §§ 1, 2, 4, 5; 1983, ch. 275, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 778, § 2; 1985, ch. 28, §§ 1-4; 1985, ch. 259, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 390, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 827, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 744, § 1; 1988, ch. 871, § 1; 1989, ch. 438, § 1; 1991, ch. 373, § 2; 1992, ch. 836, § 1; 1994, ch. 536, § 1; 2002, ch. 468, § 1; 2012, ch. 511, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Districts of substantially equal population required, districts to be reapportioned as needed, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 4.

Splitting precincts, §2-3-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Census, § 1; 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 2.